Utah statutes.
38-3-6.   Execution of writ of attachment.

It shall be the duty of the officer to whom the writ of attachment is directed to seize the property of such lessee subject to such lien, or as much thereof as shall be necessary to satisfy such debt and costs, and to keep the same until the determination of the action, unless the property is sooner released by bond or the attachment is discharged.



No Change Since 1953

